Nevada, session 83, SB357.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 388.419 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.419 1. The Department shall:
(a) Prescribe a form that contains the basic information
necessary for the uniform development, review and revision of an
individualized education program for a pupil with a disability in
accordance with 20 U.S.C. § 1414(d); and
(b) Make the form available on a computer disc for use by
school districts and, upon request, in any other manner deemed
reasonable by the Department.
2. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, each school
district shall ensure that the form prescribed by the Department is
used for the development, review and revision of an individualized
education program for each pupil with a disability who receives
special education in the school district. A school district may use an
expanded form that contains additions to the form prescribed by the
Department if the basic information contained in the expanded form
complies with the form prescribed by the Department.
3. The State Board:
(a) Shall prescribe minimum standards for the special education
of pupils with disabilities.
(b) May prescribe minimum standards for the provision of early
intervening services.
4. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board must
include standards for programs of instruction or special services
maintained for the purpose of serving pupils with:
(a) Hearing impairments, including, but not limited to, deafness.
(b) Visual impairments, including, but not limited to, blindness.
(c) Orthopedic impairments.
-
*SB357*

– 3 –
(d) Speech and language impairments.
(e) Intellectual disabilities.
(f) Multiple impairments.
(g) Emotional disturbances.
(h) Other health impairments.
(i) Specific learning disabilities.
(j) Autism spectrum disorders.
(k) Traumatic brain injuries.
(l) Developmental delays.
5. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with hearing impairments, including, without limitation,
deafness, pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 4 must comply
with:
(a) The Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C.
§§ 1400 et seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto;
(b) The effective communication requirement of Title II of the
Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, 42 U.S.C. §§ 12131 et
seq., and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto; and
(c) Section 504 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. §
794, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.
6. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with visual impairments, including, without limitation,
blindness, pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 4 must include,
without limitation:
(a) Standards for the provision of instruction in Braille and
the use of Braille; and
(b) Guidelines for providing for and integrating assistive
technology and assistive technology services into instruction
pursuant to paragraph (b) of subsection 2 of NRS 388.437.
7. The minimum standards prescribed by the State Board for
pupils with dyslexia pursuant to paragraph (i) of subsection 4 must
include, without limitation, standards for instruction on:
(a) Phonemic awareness to enable a pupil to detect, segment,
blend and manipulate sounds in spoken language;
(b) Graphonomic knowledge for teaching the sounds associated
with letters in the English language;
(c) The structure of the English language, including, without
limitation, morphology, semantics, syntax and pragmatics;
(d) Linguistic instruction directed toward proficiency and
fluency with the patterns of language so that words and sentences
are carriers of meaning; and
(e) Strategies that a pupil may use for decoding, encoding, word
recognition, fluency and comprehension.
[7.] 8. No apportionment of state money may be made to any
school district or charter school for the instruction of pupils with
-
*SB357*

– 4 –
disabilities until the program of instruction maintained therein for
such pupils is approved by the Superintendent of Public Instruction
as meeting the minimum standards prescribed by the State Board.
[8.] 9. The Department shall, upon the request of the board of
trustees of a school district, provide information to the board of
trustees concerning the identification and evaluation of pupils with
disabilities in accordance with the standards prescribed by the State
Board.
[9.] 10. The Department shall post on the Internet website
maintained by the Department the data that is submitted to the
United States Secretary of Education pursuant to 20 U.S.C. § 1418
within 30 days after submission of the data to the Secretary in a
manner that does not result in the disclosure of data that is
identifiable to an individual pupil.
11. As used in this section:
(a) “Assistive technology” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “assistive technology device” in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(1) and
includes, without limitation, a laptop computer or tablet device.
(b) “Assistive technology services” has the meaning ascribed
to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(2).
Sec. 2. NRS 388.437 is hereby amended to read as follows:
388.437 1. When developing an individualized education
program for a pupil with a hearing impairment in accordance with
NRS 388.419, the pupil’s individualized education program team
shall consider, without limitation:
(a) The related services and program options that provide the
pupil with an appropriate and equal opportunity for communication
access;
(b) The pupil’s primary communication mode;
(c) The availability to the pupil of a sufficient number of age,
cognitive, academic and language peers of similar abilities;
(d) The availability to the pupil of adult models who are deaf or
hearing impaired and who use the pupil’s primary communication
mode;
(e) The availability of special education teachers, interpreters
and other special education personnel who are proficient in the
pupil’s primary communication mode;
(f) The provision of academic instruction, school services and
direct access to all components of the educational process,
including, without limitation, advanced placement courses, career
and technical education courses, recess, lunch, extracurricular
activities and athletic activities;
(g) The preferences of the parent or guardian of the pupil
concerning the best feasible services, placement and content of the
pupil’s individualized education program; and
-
*SB357*

– 5 –
(h) The appropriate assistive technology necessary to provide
the pupil with an appropriate and equal opportunity for
communication access.
2. When developing an individualized education program for
a pupil with a visual impairment, including, without limitation,
blindness, in accordance with NRS 388.419, the pupil’s
individualized education program team shall, without limitation:
(a) If the parent or legal guardian of the pupil requests that
the pupil receive instruction in Braille and the use of Braille,
provide for instruction in Braille and the use of Braille;
(b) Provide that the pupil receive any assistive technology and
assistive technology services necessary to provide the pupil with a
free appropriate public education pursuant to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.; and
(c) Include in the individualized education program a
requirement that the ability of the pupil to carry a cane or walking
stick must not be interfered with or disturbed by any employee of
the school district or charter school in which the pupil is enrolled.
3. When developing an individualized education program for a
pupil with a hearing or visual impairment who is less than 6 years of
age, including, without limitation, such a pupil with both hearing
and visual impairments, in accordance with NRS 388.419, the
pupil’s individualized education program team shall use the criteria
prescribed pursuant to NRS 388.519, in addition to any methods of
assessment required by federal law, to evaluate the pupil’s
development of language and literacy skills and to determine
whether to modify the individualized education program. If the team
determines that the pupil is not making adequate progress in the
development of language and literacy skills, the team must include
in the plan:
(a) A detailed explanation of the reasons that the pupil is not
making adequate progress; and
(b) Recommendations for services and programs to assist the
pupil’s development of language and literacy skills.
[3.] 4. When developing an individualized education program
for a pupil pursuant to this section, the pupil’s individualized
education program team shall, to the maximum extent
appropriate, provide for the placement of the pupil in the least
restrictive environment pursuant to the Individuals with
Disabilities Education Act, 20 U.S.C. § 1412(a)(5). In making this
determination of placement, the team shall:
(a) Consider any potentially harmful effects on the pupil and
the quality of any special education services required by the pupil
if the pupil is placed in a general education classroom;
-
*SB357*

– 6 –
(b) Provide for the placement of the pupil in a general
education classroom unless the team determines that the pupil
cannot receive a free appropriate public education in the least
restrictive environment in a general education classroom, even
with the provision of supplementary aids and services and assistive
technology and assistive technology services;
(c) Include the basis for the determination of placement in the
individualized education program for the pupil; and
(d) Comply with the Individuals with Disabilities Education
Act, 20 U.S.C. §§ 1400 et seq.
5. When determining the best feasible instruction to be
provided to the pupil in his or her primary communication mode, the
pupil’s individualized education program team may consider,
without limitation:
(a) Changes in the pupil’s hearing or vision;
(b) Development in or availability of assistive technology;
(c) The physical design and acoustics of the learning
environment; and
(d) The subject matter of the instruction to be provided.
6. As used in this section:
(a) “Assistive technology” has the meaning ascribed to the
term “assistive technology device” in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(1) and
includes, without limitation, a laptop computer or tablet device.
(b) “Assistive technology service” has the meaning ascribed to
it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(2).
(c) “General education classroom” means a classroom that is
primarily tailored for the instruction of pupils without disabilities.
(d) “Supplementary aids and services” has the meaning
ascribed to it in 20 U.S.C. § 1401(33).
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB357*